Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5487.
people of the state of michigan enact: provisions concerning appropriations CAPITAL OUTLAY Sec. 301. The cost to construct the Michigan Technological University ? H-STEM Engineering and Health Technology Complex ? Phase I project, initially authorized for construction in 2020 PA 257 and reauthorized in 2022 PA 10, is decreased by $1,514,800.00 to a new total project cost of $51,585,200.00 (total state building authority share $29,699,800.00; Michigan Technological University share $21,885,200.00; state general fund/general purpose share $200.00).